North Carolina, session 2025, SB377.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-33-30 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-30. License requirements.
The Commissioner shall not issue or continue any license of an insurance producer, limited
representative, adjuster, or motor vehicle damage appraiser except as follows:
…
(d) Education and Training. –
(1) Each applicant must have had special education, training, or
experience of sufficient duration and extent reasonably to satisfy the
Commissioner that the applicant possesses the competence necessary
to fulfill the responsibilities of an insurance producer, limited
representative, adjuster, or motor vehicle damage appraiser. The
Commissioner shall not require an individual who applies for an
insurance producer license in this State to complete any specific
amount of instruction or any specific course of instruction.
(2) All individual applicants for licensing as insurance producers under
G.S. 58-33-26(c1)(1), (2), (4), (6), or (7) shall furnish evidence
satisfactory to the Commissioner of successful completion of at least
20 hours of instruction for each license, which shall in all cases include
the general principles of insurance and any other topics relevant to the
license that the Commissioner establishes by administrative rules. Any
applicant who submits satisfactory evidence of having successfully
completed a producer training course that has been approved by the
Commissioner and that is offered by or under the auspices of a
property, casualty, life or accident and health or sickness insurance
company admitted to do business in this State or a professional
insurance association shall be deemed to have satisfied the educational
requirements of this subdivision.Any producer training course
developed for the purpose of preparing an applicant for the
examination required by subsection (e) of this section must be
approved by the Commissioner.
(3) Each resident applicant for a Medicare supplement and long-term care
insurance license shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the
*S377-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Commissioner of successful completion of 10 hours of instruction,
which shall in all cases include the principles of Medicare supplement
and long-term care insurance and federal and North Carolina law
relating to such insurance. A resident applicant who submits
satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed a producer
training course that has been approved by the Commissioner and that
is offered by or under the auspices of a licensed life or health insurer
or a professional insurance association satisfies the educational
requirements of this subdivision.
(e) Examination. –
…
(5) The Commissioner shall collect in advance the examination and
registration fees provided in G.S. 58-33-125 and in subsection
subdivision (4) of this section. subsection. The Commissioner shall
make or cause to be made available to all applicants, for a reasonable
fee to offset the costs of production, materials that he considers
necessary for the applicants' proper preparation for examinations. The
Commissioner may contract directly with publishers and other
suppliers for the production of the preparatory materials, and contracts
so let by the Commissioner shall not be subject to Article 3 of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes. However, the Commissioner shall: (i)
submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing,
equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000) authorized by this subdivision to the Attorney General or
the Attorney General's designee for review as provided in
G.S. 114-8.3; and (ii) include in all contracts to be awarded by the
Commissioner under this subdivision a standard clause which provides
that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Commissioner may
audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the
contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance.
The Commissioner shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost
contract for any purpose.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 58-33-32 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-32. Interstate reciprocity in producer licensing.
…
(g) An individual who applies for an insurance producer license in this State who was
previously licensed for the same lines of authority in that individual's home state shall not be
required to complete any prelicensing education or examination. This exemption is available only
if:
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to licensure
applications submitted on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 377-First Edition